Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1314
Delegation of authority.

Any official named in sections 81-1301 to 81-1317 shall have the power to delegate authority for execution of responsibilities under sections 81-1301 to 81-1317 to any person such official may designate.

Laws 1967, c. 573, § 14, p. 1896.